Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,383
Implement of husbandry; weight and load limitations; operation restrictions.

(1) An implement of husbandry being operated on any highway of this state, except the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, shall be exempt from the weight and load limitations of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 60-6,294 but shall be subject to any ordinances or resolutions enacted by local authorities pursuant to section 60-681.

(2) An implement of husbandry being operated on any highway of this state shall not cross any culvert with a span of more than sixty inches or any bridge if the vehicle axle, axle groupings, or gross weight exceeds the limits established in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 60-6,294 or weight limits established by bridge postings.

(3) For purposes of this section, an implement of husbandry includes (a) a farm tractor with or without a towed farm implement, (b) a self-propelled farm implement, (c) self-propelled equipment designed and used exclusively to carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to agricultural soil or crops, (d) an agricultural floater-spreader implement as defined in section 60-303, (e) a fertilizer spreader, nurse tank, or truck permanently mounted with a spreader used for spreading or injecting water, dust, or liquid fertilizers or agricultural chemicals, (f) a truck mounted with a spreader used or manufactured to spread or inject animal manure, and (g) a mixer-feed truck owned and used by a livestock-raising operation designed for and used for the feeding of livestock.

Laws 2016, LB977, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB310, § 3.